Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-503
Election; tax; how collected; resubmission of proposal.

The county board, upon being satisfied that all the foregoing requirements have been substantially complied with, and that sixty percent of all the votes cast at said election are in favor of such tax, shall cause such proposition and all the proceedings had thereon to be entered upon the records of said county board, and shall make an order that said levy be carried on the tax lists in a column for that purpose, and collected as other taxes; Provided, that the question of levying such taxes, when defeated, shall not be resubmitted in substance for a period of one year from and after the date of said election.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 3, p. 129;

R.S.1913, § 438;

C.S.1922, § 355;

Laws 1923, c. 186, § 1, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 11-703;

R.S.1943, § 23-503.

Inclusion of an airport authority budget in general city budget hearing did not meet requirement of public budget hearing, after notice, by airport authority. Willms v. Nebraska City Airport Authority, 193 Neb. 567, 228 N.W.2d 276 (1975).